Hawaii statutes.
[§142-4.5] Health certificate. Any
animal entering the State pursuant to this chapter shall be accompanied by a
valid health certificate. The health certificate shall include information as
to the animal's identification, approximate age, species, and sex if the
animal's sex can be practicably and reasonably determined. The animal shall be
free of certain internal and external parasites as prescribed by departmental
rules. A statement confirming this parasite-free status shall be noted on the
health certificate. The animal shall also appear to be free of any infectious
or contagious diseases and to the best of the issuing veterinarian's knowledge,
shall not have been exposed to any of those diseases. A statement to this
effect shall also be noted on the health certificate. In addition to the
requirements of this section, any person responsible for any live animal
entering the State, shall comply with appropriate departmental rules. [L 1986,
c 265, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next